Utah statutes.
78B-2-210.   Adverse possession -- Under written instrument or judgment.

(1)  Property is considered to have been adversely held if a person in possession of the property, either personally or through another:

(a)  possesses a written document purporting to convey title; or

(b)  possesses a decree or judgment from a court of competent jurisdiction conveying title; and

(c)  has occupied the property continuously for at least seven years.

(2)  If the property consists of a tract divided into lots, the possession of one lot is not considered a possession of any other lot in the same tract.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

